Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.091

License required.

No person, unless previously licensed to practice dentistry in this state, shall begin the practice of dentistry in this state without first applying to, and obtaining a license.

[ 2017 c 320 s 5; 1987 c 150 s 18.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2017 c 320: See note following RCW 18.32.677.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.